Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202573-1102
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the State Building Construction Alternatives Act:

(1) Alternative technical concept means changes suggested by a qualified, eligible, short-listed design-builder to the basic configurations, project scope, design, or construction criteria of the authorized agency;

(2) Authorized agency means the Department of Correctional Services, the Department of Transportation, the Military Department, or the state building division;

(3) Best value-based selection process means a process of selecting a design-builder using price, schedule, and qualifications for evaluation factors;

(4) Construction manager means the legal entity which proposes to enter into a construction manager-general contractor contract pursuant to the State Building Construction Alternatives Act;

(5) Construction manager-general contractor contract means a contract which is subject to a qualification-based selection process between an authorized agency and a construction manager to furnish preconstruction services during the design development phase of the project and, if an agreement can be reached which is satisfactory to the authorized agency, construction services for the construction phase of the project;

(6) Construction services means activities associated with building the project;

(7) Design-build contract means a contract between an authorized agency and a design-builder which is subject to a best value-based selection process to furnish (a) architectural, engineering, and related design services and (b) labor, materials, supplies, equipment, and construction services;

(8) Design-builder means the legal entity which proposes to enter into a design-build contract;

(9) Preconstruction services means all nonconstruction-related services that a construction manager performs in relation to the design of the project before execution of a contract for construction services. Preconstruction services includes, but is not limited to, cost estimating, value management studies, constructability reviews, delivery schedule assessments, and support of life-cycle analysis;

(10) Project performance criteria means the performance requirements of the project suitable to allow the design-builder to make a proposal. Performance requirements shall include, but are not limited to, the following, if required by the project: Capacity, durability, standards, ingress and egress requirements, description of the site, surveys, soil and environmental information concerning the site, material quality standards, design and milestone dates, site development requirements, compliance with applicable law, and other criteria for the intended use of the project;

(11) Proposal means an offer in response to a request for proposals (a) by a design-builder to enter into a design-build contract or (b) by a construction manager to enter into a construction manager-general contractor contract;

(12) Qualification-based selection process means a process of selecting a construction manager based on qualifications;

(13) Request for proposals means the documentation by which an authorized agency solicits proposals; and

(14) Request for qualifications means the documentation or publication by which an authorized agency solicits qualifications.

Laws 2025, LB660, § 2.